Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB857.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 514.1. Real Property Acquisition Limitations.--(a) The purchase or trade of land may not be made by or gift of land 20250SB0857PN0958 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accepted by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, the Pennsylvania Game Commission or the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission unless the governing body of the county in which the land is located approves the acquisition.(b) Prior to completion of purchase or trade of land or acceptance of a gift of land, municipalities in which the land to be acquired or traded is located and residents thereof shall be given thirty (30) days' notice and opportunity to comment on the acquisition.Section 2. All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of section 514.1 of the act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0857PN0958 - 3 - 12345678910111213